Illinois, session 104th, HB4697.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 527-23.19 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/27-23.19 new)7    Sec. 27-23.19. Active-transportation safety training. 8    (a) As used in this Section, "active transportation" means 9bicycling, pedestrian activities, and other forms of 10nonmotorized transportation.11    (b) Each school district maintaining any elementary grades 12must provide its public school pupils enrolled in kindergarten 13through grade 3 with age-appropriate, active-transportation 14safety training. At a minimum, the active-transportation 15safety training must include pedestrian safety, including 16crossing roads.17    (c) Each school district maintaining any elementary grades 18must provide its public school pupils enrolled in grades 4 19through 8 with age-appropriate, active-transportation safety 20training. At a minimum, the active-transportation safety 21training must include:22        (1) pedestrian safety, including crossing roads safely 23    using the technique of searching left, right, and left for   HB4697- 2 -LRB104 15810 LNS 29009 b1    vehicles in traffic;2        (2) bicycle safety, including relevant traffic laws, 3    the use and proper fit of protective headgear, bicycle 4    parts and safety features, and safe biking techniques; and5        (3) electric-assisted bicycle safety, including that a 6    person under the age of 16 is not allowed to operate an 7    electric-assisted bicycle.8    (d) A nonpublic school maintaining any elementary grades 9may provide its nonpublic school pupils enrolled in 10kindergarten through grade 8 with active-transportation safety 11training as specified in subsections (b) and (c).12    (e) Students under subsection (b) who are enrolled during 13the first or second week of school and have not previously 14received active-transportation safety training as specified in 15subsection (b) must receive the active-transportation safety 16training by the end of the third week of school.17    (f) Students under subsection (c) who are enrolled during 18the first or second week of school and have not previously 19received active-transportation safety training as specified in 20subsection (c) must receive the active-transportation safety 21training by the end of the sixth week of school.22    (g) Students under subsection (b) or (c) who enroll in a 23school after the second week of school and have not received 24the appropriate active-transportation safety training from 25their previous school must undergo the training or receive 26active-transportation safety instructional materials within 4   HB4697- 3 -LRB104 15810 LNS 29009 b1weeks after the first day of attendance.2    (h) A school district and a nonpublic school may provide 3kindergarten pupils with active-transportation safety training 4under this Section before the first day of school.5    (i) A school district may provide active-transportation 6safety training under this Section through an online program 7or course.8    (j) A school district and a nonpublic school must make 9reasonable accommodations under this Section for the 10active-transportation safety training of pupils known to speak 11English as a second language and pupils with disabilities.12    (k) The Secretary of Transportation must maintain a 13comprehensive collection of active-transportation safety 14training materials that meets the requirements of this 15Section. 16    (l) This Section is in addition to any other 17transportation-safety training laws.